Utah statutes.
76-7-102.   Incest -- Definitions -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Provider" means a person who provides or makes available his seminal fluid or her human egg.

(b)  "Related person" means a person related to the provider or actor as an ancestor, descendant, brother, sister, uncle, aunt, nephew, niece, or first cousin, and includes:

(i)  blood relationships of the whole or half blood without regard to legitimacy;

(ii)  the relationship of parent and child by adoption; and

(iii)  the relationship of stepparent and stepchild while the marriage creating the relationship of a stepparent and stepchild exists.

(2) (a)  An actor is guilty of incest when, under circumstances not amounting to rape, rape of a child, or aggravated sexual assault, the actor knowingly and intentionally:

(i)  engages in conduct under Subsection (2)(b)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv); or

(ii)  provides a human egg or seminal fluid under Subsection (2)(b)(v).

(b)  Conduct referred to under Subsection (2)(a) is:

(i)  sexual intercourse between the actor and a person the actor knows has kinship to the actor as a related person;

(ii)  the insertion or placement of the provider's seminal fluid into the vagina, cervix, or uterus of a related person by means other than sexual intercourse;

(iii)  providing or making available his seminal fluid for the purpose of insertion or placement of the fluid into the vagina, cervix, or uterus of a related person by means other than sexual intercourse;

(iv)  a woman 18 years of age or older who:

(A)  knowingly allows the insertion of the seminal fluid of a provider into her vagina, cervix, or uterus by means other than sexual intercourse; and

(B)  knows that the seminal fluid is that of a person with whom she has kinship as a related person; or

(v)  providing the actor's sperm or human egg that is used to conduct in vitro fertilization, or any other means of fertilization, with the human egg or sperm of a person who is a related person.

(c)  This Subsection (2) does not prohibit providing a fertilized human egg if the provider of the fertilizing sperm is not a related person regarding the person providing the egg.

(3)  Incest is a third degree felony.

(4)  A provider under this section is not a donor under Section 78B-15-702.

